Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Subchapter 5. Financial Matters

§ 11-5.1.
Grand list.

The grand list of the Town of Essex composed of the taxable property and estate within the limits of the District shall constitute the grand list of the District. The District may at an annual or special meeting legally warned for that purpose vote to
lay and assess a tax on its grand list for school purposes, and all taxes so voted, laid, or assessed shall be paid and collected in the same manner as is proved by law or by this chapter for the payment and collection of town taxes,
and the Prudential Committee, Clerk-Treasurer, and Collector of Taxes shall perform the same duties and have the same authority in respect thereto as is provided by law for members of selectboards, treasurers, collectors of taxes,
and collectors of delinquent taxes in towns, except that the District shall charge a collection fee of eight percent in addition to any interest owing on any and all tax payments, including installment payments, made after expiration
of the time established in the notice of taxes due mailed to each taxpayer as required by law.

§ 11-5.2.
Borrowing.

The District may borrow money in any year in anticipation of taxes assessed in such year, in an amount not to exceed 90 percent of the taxes assessed in such year. Such notes or orders, however, must mature within one year from the date thereof and be
paid from the taxes assessed and collected in such year.

§ 11-5.3.
Issuance of negotiable bonds.

The District is hereby authorized and empowered by a vote of a majority of all voters voting at a legally warned meeting held for that purpose to issue its negotiable bonds or negotiable interest-bearing notes pursuant to State statutes.